dictionaries/sk/index.dic
absolvent/C
abstrakcionista/H
adamita/H
adresát/C
adventista/H
aforista/H
aga/H
agrotechnik/C
aktivista/H
akvarista/H
alchymista/H
alibista/H
almužník/C
alpinista/H
altista/H
altruista/H
analista/H
anarchista/H
ancikrist/C
anglista/H
animalista/H
animátor/C
animista/H
antifašista/H
antimarxista/H
antimilitarista/H
antisemita/H
antisemitista/H
aparátnik/C
arabista/H
arcibiskup/C
arcivojvoda/H
aristotelovec/C
artista/H
askéta/H
ašpirant/C
ateista/H
atomista/H
autokrat/C
automobilista/H
autonomista/H
avanturista/H
azylant/C
bača/H
bagrista/H
bachráň/C
bandita/H
baník/C
baptista/H
Barnabáš/C
barytonista/H
basgitarista/H
basista/H
basketbalista/H
baša/H
beduín/C
behaviorista/H
bej/C
beletrista/H
beloch/C
bezočivec/C
biatlonista/H
bicyklebalista/H
bicyklista/H
bielič/C
biliardista/H
bilingvista/H
bitkár/C
bludár/C
bohemista/H
boľševik/C
bradáč/C
brit/C
brusič/C
Budha/H
budhista/H
buldozerista/H
bumbaj/C
buržoa/H
cárovič/C
causerista/H
centralista/H
cestár/C
cimbalista/H
cirkusant/C
citarista/H
civilista/H
corgoň/C
cyklista/H
čachrár/C
čašník/C
čechoslovakista/H
čelista/H
čertík/C
činelista/H
čipkár/C
čudák/C
dadaista/H
dalajláma/H
daltonista/H
darca/H
daromník/C
darvinista/H
darwinista/H
davista/H
defetista/H
defraudant/C
deista/H
dekabrista/H
delič/C
dentista/H
denunciant/C
despota/H
detailista/H
detektív/C
determinista/H
diagnostik/C
diletant/C
diskotekár/C
diverzant/C
divotvorca/H
dobrista/H
dobrovoľník/C
dohodca/H
dôchodca/H
doktorand/C
dokumentarista/H
domobranec/C
dopravca/H
dorastenec/C
dovozca/H
dozorca/H
dráčik/C
drevorubač/C
drogérista/H
drogista/H
druhoročiak/C
družba/H
duatlonista/H
duch/CB
Dzurinda/H
džbankár/C
džudista/H
egoista/H
ekvilibrista/H
elegán/C
elév/C
energetik/C
environmentalista/H
esejista/H
esenbák/C
esperantista/H
etik/C
evakuant/C
evanjelista/H
evolucionista/H
exhibicionista/H
existencialista/H
exlibrista/H
exminister/C
expresionista/H
exprezident/C
externista/H
extrémista/H
fakturant/C
fantasta/H
farizej/C
fašista/H
fatalista/H
federalista/H
fejtonista/H
feminista/H
fenomén/BC
fetišista/H
feualista/H
feudalista/H
fiakrista/H
fideista/H
filatelista/H
filigrán/C
filumenista/H
finalista/H
finančník/C
flautista/H
fľocháň/C
folklorista/H
formalista/H
fotografista/H
fotolaborant/C
františkán/C
frázista/H
fujarista/H
fúkač/C
Fulla/H
fundamentalista/H
futbalista/H
futurista/H
fuzáň/C
gambáč/C
gardista/H
Gaskonec/C
gazda/H
Gejza/H
generál/C
geograf/C
germanista/H
gigantopitek/C
gitarista/H
goral/C
grafitista/H
Grék/C
gumák/C
gymnasta/H
gymnazista/H
hacker/C
hajzeľ/CB
harfista/H
Havajec/C
hedonista/H
helóta/H
heretik/C
heroinista/H
hispanista/H
hlásič/C
hlasista/H
hlucháň/C
hniliak/C
hobojista/H
hochštapler/C
hokejista/H
homár/C
horlivec/C
hovorca/H
hrabáč/C
hrbáč/C
hrdina/H
hromovládca/H
hubár/C
humanista/H
humorista/H
hundroš/C
hungarista/H
husita/H
huslista/H
hypersexuál/C
chalupár/C
Chalupka/H
chlapák/C
chlebodarca/H
chodec/C
chórista/H
chrastavec/C
chválenkár/C
idealista/H
Iľja/H
ilustrátor/C
iluzionista/H
imperialista/H
impresionista/H
Indián/C
individualista/H
inkvizítor/C
inštruktor/C
inštrumentalista/H
internacionalista/H
internetista/H
internista/H
interpret/C
iontomenič/C
iredentista/H
izraelita/H
Japonec/C
jazdec/C
jednotkár/C
Jehova/H
jehovista/H
jezuita/H
jogista/H
Jozua/H
Júda/H
judaista/H
Judáš/C
judista/H
jurista/H
kaderník/C
kalif/C
kalvinista/H
kamzík/C
kanoista/H
kapelník/C
kapitalista/H
karatista/H
karavanista/H
karierista/H
karikaturista/H
karmelitán/C
kastelán/C
katechéta/H
kazivec/C
kempista/H
klamár/C
klarinetista/H
klasicista/H
klavirista/H
klérofašista/H
klient/C
knihovník/C
kojenec/C
kokainista/H
kolega/H
kolektivista/H
kolonialista/H
kolonista/H
kolonizátor/C
kombajnista/H
kominár/C
komparzista/H
komponista/H
komunista/H
komutátor/C
konformista/H
koniar/C
konjukturalista/H
konštruktivista/H
kontraadmirál/C
kontrabasista/H
konvertita/H
konzervatorista/H
koordinátor/C
korenár/C
korytár/C
kouč/C
kozmológ/C
kozmopolita/H
krajinkár/C
krasojazdec/C
kreacionista/H
kresťan/CN
kriminalista/H
krížovkár/C
krpčiar/C
kryptokomunista/H
kubista/H
kujon/C
kulturista/H
kunsthistorik/C
kurič/C
kurzista/H
Kvád/C
Kyklop/C
labourista/H
ľahtikár/C
lámač/C
láma/H
lamaista/H
lastovičiar/C
lazník/C
leninista/H
leninovec/C
lesník/C
lezec/C
libretista/H
lilipután/C
lingvista/H
lodiar/C
Lotyš/C
ľudovec/C
lupič/C
maďarčinár/C
mafista/H
majetník/C
Maloázijec/C
malopredajca/H
mamonár/C
manierista/H
maniok/C
maród/C
maskér/C
masochista/H
matrikár/C
maximalista/H
medailér/C
mechanik/C
mestic/C
mešťanosta/H
metropolita/H
mezzospranista/H
milenec/C
mincier/C
minimalista/H
mládenec/C
mliečniak/C
mocnár/C
Mohamed/C
monarcha/H
monopolista/H
montér/C
moralista/H
motorista/H
mravokárca/H
mraziar/C
muflón/C
muzikant/C
nacista/H
nactiutŕhač/C
nadriadená/C
nahuckávač/C
nájomca/H
nálezca/H
námestník/C
národohospodár/C
nástupník/C
naturalista/H
návrhár/C
nebojsa/H
nedbanlivec/C
nehanebník/C
neofašista/H
neogabanec/C
neonacista/H
nepodarenec/C
nespratník/C
nevedomec/C
nezbedník/C
nihilista/H
nitár/C
nosáň/C
novelista/H
novorodenec/C
nudista/H
obilninár/C
objektivista/H
obranár/C
obžalobca/H
odbojník/C
odkundes/C
odporca/H
ochotník/C
okultista/H
okupant/C
opatrník/C
oplan/C
oportunista/H
oráč/C
organista/H
oselník/C
osmorák/C
oštepár/C
ovčiar/C
pacifista/H
Pakistanec/C
Panamec/C
pankhart/C
panteista/H
paralytik/C
pária/H
partner/C
pastor/C
pátrač/C
patriarcha/H
pedikér/C
peňažník/C
perfekcionista/H
pesimista/H
petrenec/C
piarista/H
pijak/C
pingpongista/H
pivot/C
plastik/C
plejboj/C
pľuhavec/C
pluralista/H
poctivec/C
podliak/C
podplamenník/C
podžupan/C
poeta/H
pochôdzkar/C
polárnik/C
pólista/H
politikár/C
polovzdelanec/C
polyteista/H
poník/C
populista/H
porotca/H
Portugalec/C
posmešník/C
postkomunista/H
poškodenec/C
poturčenec/C
pôvodca/H
povozník/C
pozitivista/H
požiarnik/C
pragmatik/C
prapôvodca/H
právnik/C
predák/C
predchodca/H
predseda/H
prefekt/C
preliminár/C
presídlenec/C
prežúvavec/C
Pribina/H
priemyselník/C
príkazca/H
primátor/C
prisťahovalec/C
privatizér/C
profík/C
propagandista/H
prorektor/C
protetik/C
prvák/C
prvodarca/H
prvovýrobca/H
psychopat/C
pučista/H
pustovník/C
rabín/C
racionalista/H
radikalista/H
radista/H
rachitik/C
rasista/H
rastlinár/C
recidivista/H
recitátor/C
reformista/H
rehoľník/C
renegát/C
reštaurátor/C
revanšista/H
režisér/C
rikša/H
roľník/C
romanista/H
rozkošník/C
roztlieskavač/C
rukojemník/C
rusista/H
rybár/C
sabotážnik/C
samopalník/C
samoplatca/H
samovládca/H
satanáš/C
saxofonista/H
sedliak/C
sémantik/C
semifinalista/H
senzualista/H
seržant/C
simulant/C
singularista/H
skejtbordista/H
skladník/C
skupáň/C
slavista/H
slepáň/C
slovenčinár/C
sluha/H
smilník/C
socialista/H
sofista/H
sokoliar/C
sólista/H
spáč/C
spiritualista/H
splnomocnenec/C
spoluhráč/C
spolutvorca/H
spoluúčastník/C
správar/C
správca/H
sprievodca/H
srnec/CL
staršina/H
statik/C
stenotypista/H
stíhač/C
strakoš/C
strážnik/C
strítbalista/H
strojmajster/C
subjektivista/H
suchozemec/C
súper/C
surfista/H
suverén/C
svetlonos/C
symbolista/H
sympaťák/C
šaman/C
šamanista/H
šarvanec/C
šéftréner/C
šiestak/C
škodca/H
škôlkár/C
škrabák/C
šmatliak/C
špecialista/H
špekulant/C
športovec/C
štatista/H
štatutár/C
štrukturalista/H
študent/C
štvorstovkár/C
štylista/H
šuhaj/C
švagrovci/C
táborník/C
taliančinár/C
talmudista/H
tankista/H
ťarbák/C
Tatarka/H
Teheránec/C
telegrafista/H
tenorista/H
terenár/C
tiežumelec/C
tlčhuba/H
tmár/C
továrnik/C
tradicionalista/H
transvestita/H
traťmajster/C
trhač/C
triatlonista/H
trochár/C
trúbkár/C
tupec/C
turista/H
úbožiak/C
udavač/C
Uhor/C
ukrutník/C
ultranacionalista/H
umenovedec/C
úpadca/H
utilitarista/H
utopenec/C
utrakvista/H
varechár/C
velezradca/H
veľkostatkár/C
verbista/H
vicepremiér/C
violista/H
vizážista/H
vladyka/H
vlajkonosič/C
vodca/H
vojvodca/H
voľnomyšlienkar/C
voluntarista/H
všetečník/C
výherca/H
vyjednávač/C
vynálezca/H
výpravca/H
vyšetrovanec/C
vývozca/H
vzpierač/C
xylofonista/H
zákazník/C
zákonodarca/H
zaslepenec/C
zástupca/H
zborista/H
zbormajster/C
zjašenec/C
znakár/C
zvariak/C
zvodca/H
žalobca/H
žehlič/C
živnostník/C
žurnalista/H
